Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 6-105.3, as
last amended by Section 3, Chapter 315, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 6-105.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-105.3. A. In addition to the licenses to operate
motor vehicles, the Department of Public Safety may issue cards to
Oklahoma residents for purposes of identification only. The
identification cards shall be issued, renewed, replaced, canceled
and denied in the same manner as driver licenses in this state. A
licensee whose record reflects a notation of the person's proof of
legal presence, verified by the U.S. Department of Homeland
Security, or proof of U.S. citizenship, may obtain a REAL ID
Req. No. 10023 Page 1

Comp liant Identification Card or a Noncompliant Identification Card
from a motor license agent or the Department of Public Safety,
regardless of the status of the license held by the licensee.
Provided, the licensee must comply with all REAL ID documentation
requirements to obtain a REAL ID Compliant Identification Card. A
person shall not apply for or possess more than one state-issued or
territory-issued REAL ID Compliant Identification Card pursuant to
the provisions of Section 6-101 of this title.
The application for an identification card by any person under
the age of eighteen (18) years shall be signed and verified by a
custodial legal parent or legal guardian, either in person before a
person authorized to administer oaths or electronically if
completing an online application, or a notarized affidavit signed by
a custodial legal parent or legal guardian submitted before a person
authorized to administer oaths by the person under the age of
eighteen (18) years with the application. Provided, that persons
under eighteen (18) years of age who are homeless children and
youth, as defined in Section 600 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma
Statutes and verified as such through the process established in
Section 2 601.6d of this act Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes,
shall be allowed to apply for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification
Card, which shall be valid for a period of four (4) years from the
month of issuance, without the signature of their parent or legal
guardian. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Req. No. 10023 Page 2

iden tification cards shall be valid for a period of either four (4)
years from the month of issuance or eight (8) years from the month
of issuance; however, the identification cards issued to persons
sixty-five (65) years of age or older shall be valid indefinitely
from the month of issuance.
B. 1. The Department of Corrections shall coordinate with the
Department of Public Safety to provide REAL ID Noncompliant
Identification Cards to all inmates who do not have a current state-
issued identification card or driver license upon their release from
custody. The identification cards shall be issued, replaced,
canceled and denied in the same manner as driver licenses in this
state.
2. The Department of Public Safety shall allow the use of a
certified copy of a birth certificate coupled with a Department of
Corrections-issued consolidated record card to serve as a valid form
of photo identification documentation to obtain a REAL ID
Noncompliant Identification Card.
3. REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Cards issued with a
consolidated record card from the Department of Corrections for
inmates shall be valid for a period of four (4) years from the month
of issuance for an allowable fee to be determined by the Department
of Public Safety and are nonrenewable and nontransferable.
4. The fee charged for the issuance or replacement of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Identification Card pursuant to this subsection shall
Req. No. 10023 Page 3

be d eposited in the Department of Public Safety Revolving Fund.
Provided, however, REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Cards issued
to individuals required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders
Registration Act shall only be valid for a period of one (1) year.
No person sixty-five (65) years of age or older shall be charged a
fee for a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card.
5. The Department of Public Safety is authorized to promulgate
rules and procedures to implement the provisions of this subsection.
C. No person shall hold more than one state-issued or
territory-issued REAL ID Compliant Driver License or REAL ID
Compliant Identification Card, as defined in subsection G of Section
6-101 of this title. The Department shall not issue a REAL ID
Compliant Identification Card to any applicant who has been
previously issued a REAL ID Compliant Driver License or REAL ID
Compliant Identification Card unless such license or identification
card has been surrendered to the Department by the applicant. The
Department may promulgate rules related to the issuance of
replacement REAL ID Compliant Identification Cards in the event of
loss or theft.
D. The fee charged for the issuance or renewal of a REAL ID
Compliant Identification Card shall be Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00)
for a 4-year card and Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for an 8-year card.
The fee charged for the issuance or renewal of a REAL ID
Noncompliant Identification Card pursuant to this section shall be
Req. No. 10023 Page 4

Twen ty-five Dollars ($25.00) for a 4-year card and Fifty Dollars
($50.00) for an 8-year card; however, no person sixty-five (65)
years of age or older, a high school student who is at least
fourteen (14) years of age or older, one hundred percent (100%)
disabled veteran described in subsection P of Section 6-101 of this
title, or persons who are homeless children and youth as defined in
Section 600 of Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes and verified
through the process established in Section 2 601.6d of this act
Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be charged a fee for an
identification card. Of each fee charged pursuant to the provisions
of this subsection:
1. Seven Dollars ($7.00) of a 4-year card and Fourteen Dollars
($14.00) of an 8-year card shall be apportioned as provided in
Section 1104 of this title;
2. Three Dollars ($3.00) of a 4-year card and Six Dollars
($6.00) of an 8-year card shall be credited to the Department of
Public Safety Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used
solely for the purpose of the administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of the Department;
3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of a 4-year card and Twenty Dollars
($20.00) of an 8-year card shall be deposited in the Department of
Public Safety Revolving Fund;


Req. No. 10023 Page 5

4. Three Dollars ($3.00) of a 4-year card and Six Dollars
($6.00) of an 8-year card shall be deposited to the State Public
Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title; and
5. Two Dollars ($2.00) for a 4-year card and Four Dollars
($4.00) for an 8-year card of the fee authorized by this subsection
related to the issuance or renewal of an identification card by a
motor license agent that does process approved applications or
renewals for REAL ID Compliant and REAL ID Noncompliant Driver
Licenses or Identification Cards shall be retained by the licensed
operator through June 30, 2023. Beginning July 1, 2023, these
monies shall be retained by the licensed operator pursuant to
subsection E of Section 1141.1 of this title.
E. The fee charged for replacement of a REAL ID Compliant
Identification Card, or REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card,
shall be Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00); however, no person sixty-five
(65) years of age or older shall be charged a fee for an
identification card replacement. Of each fee charged pursuant to
the provisions of this subsection:
1. Seven Dollars ($7.00) shall be apportioned as provided in
Section 1104 of this title;
2. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be credited to the Department of
Public Safety Computer Imaging System Revolving Fund to be used
solely for the purpose of the administration and maintenance of the
computerized imaging system of the Department;
Req. No. 10023 Page 6

3. Ten Dollars ($10.00) shall be deposited in the Department of
Public Safety Revolving Fund;
4. Three Dollars ($3.00) shall be deposited to the State Public
Safety Fund created in Section 2-147 of this title; and
5. Two Dollars ($2.00) of the fee authorized by this subsection
related to the replacement of an identification card by a motor
license agent that does process approved applications or renewals
for REAL ID Compliant or REAL ID Noncompliant Driver Licenses or
Identification Cards shall be retained by the licensed operator
through June 30, 2023. Beginning July 1, 2023, these monies shall
be retained by the licensed operator pursuant to subsection E of
Section 1141.1 of this title.
F. The Oklahoma Tax Commission is hereby authorized to
reimburse, from funds available to that agency, each motor license
agent issuing an identification card to a person sixty-five (65)
years of age or older, an amount not to exceed One Dollar ($1.00)
for each card or driver license so issued through June 30, 2023.
The Tax Commission shall develop procedures for claims for
reimbursement.
G. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a person
makes application for a new identification card, or makes
application to renew an identification card, and the person has been
convicted of, or received a deferred judgment for, any offense
required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act,
Req. No. 10023 Page 7

the identification card shall be valid for a period of one (1) year
from the month of issuance, but may be renewed yearly during the
time the person is subject to registration on the Sex Offender
Registry. The cost for such identification card shall be the same
as for other identification cards and renewals.
H. Nothing in this section requires or authorizes the
Department of Public Safety to issue a REAL ID Noncompliant
Identification Card without the documentation required by the
provisions of paragraph 9 of subsection A of Section 6-103 of this
title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10023 JBH 10/14/24











Req. No. 10023 Page 8